New York, session 2025-2026, S479.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 265.37 of the penal law is REPEALED. 2 § 2. Paragraph 7-f of subdivision a of section 265.20 of the penal law 3 is REPEALED. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01133-01-5